Utah statutes.
31A-32a-101.   Title and scope.

(1)  This chapter is known as the "Medical Care Savings Account Act."

(2) (a)  This chapter applies only to a medical care savings account established for the purpose of seeking a tax credit under Section 59-10-1021.

(b)  This chapter does not apply to a medical care savings account with respect to which a tax credit is not claimed under Section 59-10-1021.



Amended by Chapter 389, 2008 General Session

